Florida, session 2026, HB423.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1003.211, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1003.211 School elopement plans.—
(1) For purposes of this section, the term:
(a) "Disability" means, for a student in kindergarten
through grade 12, an autism spectrum disorder, as defined in the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth
Edition, published by the American Psychiatric Association, or
an intellectual disability, as defined in s. 393.063.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb423-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 423 2026
(b) "Elopement" means when a student with autism or
another disability, who has a documented history of elopement or
an identified safety risk related to elopement, leaves a safe or
designated area, the supervision of school staff, or school
grounds without authorization or awareness of potential risk.
The term may include wandering, walking away, running away, or
otherwise departing an assigned location unsupervised or
unnoticed. This term only applies when the behavior is connected
to the student's disability-related needs and poses a safety
concern. The term does not include intentional class skipping or
other nondisability-related absences.
(2) To ensure the safety of students with disabilities at
risk of elopement, each public school shall create a School
Staff Assistance for Emergencies (SAFE) Team and a school
elopement plan. The plan must include:
(a) Procedures for immediately contacting the student's
parent or guardian if a student with disabilities elopes.
(b) Procedures for conducting an immediate, coordinated
on-campus search and contacting emergency services only when the
student is reasonably believed, based on verified information or
direct observation, to have left school grounds and to be at
risk of harm.
(3) The school principal and an assistant principal shall
serve on the SAFE Team and the school principal shall appoint at
least three other members to serve on the team, including the
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb423-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 423 2026
school resource officer. The SAFE Team shall:
(a) Create and annually update the school elopement plan
and respond to all elopements.
(b) Provide training to all school personnel to
familiarize such personnel with the school elopement plan and
all necessary procedures.
(4)(a) If a student with disabilities is prone to
elopement, the SAFE Team, in coordination with the student's
parent, must create a student-specific elopement quick reference
guide. The elopement quick reference guide must include all of
the following:
1. The student's identifying information.
2. A current photograph of the student.
3. The student's level of communication.
4. A list of the student's interests, behaviors,
preferences, and aversions.
5. Any health considerations for the student.
6. A list of any GPS technology that could be used to help
locate the student.
7. A list of possible locations where the student may go
when eloping.
(b) The SAFE Team must distribute a student's elopement
quick reference guide to the student's parent and all relevant
school personnel.
(5) Each public school must annually provide its elopement
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb423-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 423 2026
plan to the district school board.
(6) The state board may adopt rules to administer this
section.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb423-00